Utah statutes.
54-8-8.   Approval of utilities' report by governing body -- Passage of resolutions -- Contents.

On the filing with the clerk of any governing body of the costs and feasibility report by the public utility corporation(s), as hereinbefore provided and after considering the same, the governing body may, at any regular or special meeting, pass a resolution declaring its intention to create a local improvement district. The resolution shall state that the costs and expenses of the district created are, except as otherwise provided for, to be levied and assessed upon the abutting, adjoining, and adjacent lots and land along or upon which improvements are to be made, and upon lots and lands benefited by such improvements and included in the improvement district created; that it is the intention of the governing body to make such improvement which will promote the public welfare; and shall further state the area and boundaries of the proposed improvement district, the character of the proposed improvement, the estimated total cost of the same, and the intention of the governing body to hold or cause to be held a public hearing on the proposed improvement.



Enacted by Chapter 157, 1969 General Session

